Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.77.110

Complaint portal.

Within existing resources, the student achievement council, the workforce training and education coordinating board, and the department of licensing shall collaborate to create a single portal for student complaints regarding issues related to consumer protection, disclosures, school or program closures, or other violations committed by institutions regulated by those three agencies. The persons staffing the portal shall refer complaints to the appropriate agency and work as a liaison between the student and relevant agency to assist in resolving the concerns or complaint. Each agency shall ensure that all students enrolled in, applying to enroll in, or obtaining loans at, institutions regulated by the agency are informed of the portal and how to file complaints. The persons staffing the portal will report to the legislature annually by November 1, 2018, the number of complaints and their resolution status.

[ 2018 c 203 s 13.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2018 c 203: See note following RCW 28B.85.095.